Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Chapter 4 Intestate Succession

Cross references. —

As to administration of estates of missing persons, see §

2-12-101

et seq.

As to guardian and ward generally, see title 3.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Fetal Equality?: The Equality State's Response to the Challenge of Protecting Unborn Children,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 193 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

23 Am. Jur. 2d Descent and Distribution § 1 et seq;
31 Am. Jur. 2d Executors and Administrators §§ 164,
233-258,
260-262, 564-835, 914-940, 942-983, 985-987.

26B C.J.S. Descent and Distribution §§ 1 et seq.; 33 C.J.S. Executors and Administrators §§ 33 to 87.